Tennessee, session 114, HB0403.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-605(d)(1)(A), is amended by
deleting "Class A misdemeanor" and substituting "Class D felony".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-605, is amended by deleting
subdivisions (d)(2) and (d)(3).
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to offenses committed on or after that date.
HB0403
001145
- 1 -